Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.170

Fairs commission—Creation, terms, compensation, powers and duties.

There is hereby created a fairs commission to consist of the director of agriculture as ex officio member and chair, and seven members appointed by the director to be persons who are interested in fair activities; at least three of whom shall be from the east side of the Cascades and three from the west side of the Cascades and one member at large. Appointments are for three-year terms, except for an appointment filling a vacancy, which is for the remainder of the original term.

Appointed members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 payable on proper vouchers submitted to and approved by the director, and payable from that portion of the state fair fund set aside for administrative costs under this chapter. The commission shall meet at the call of the chair, but at least annually. It shall be the duty of the commission to act as an advisory committee to the director, to evaluate fairs to help determine merit under RCW 15.76.150(2), to assist in the preparation of the merit rating used in determining allocations to be made to fairs, and to perform such other duties as may be required by the director from time to time.

[ 2018 c 280 s 8; 2010 c 8 s 6100; 1984 c 287 s 18; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 21; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 11; 1961 c 61 s 8.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.